Utah statutes.
11-49-403.   Subpoena powers.

(1)  Except for a preliminary review described in Section 11-49-602, for a proceeding authorized by this chapter, the commission may issue a subpoena to:

(a)  require the attendance of a witness;

(b)  direct the production of evidence; or

(c)  require both the attendance of a witness and the production of evidence.

(2)  The commission shall issue a subpoena:

(a)  in accordance with Section 11-49-405;

(b)  at the direction of the commission chair, if the chair determines that the testimony or evidence is relevant to the review of a complaint under Part 7, Commission Review of Ethics Violations; or

(c)  upon a vote of a majority of the commission members.

(3)  If the commission issues a subpoena authorized under this section, the commission shall give a reasonable period of time for the person or entity to whom the subpoena is directed to petition a district court to quash or modify the subpoena before the time specified in the subpoena for compliance.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

